Hawaii statutes.
[§461J-10.15] Recordkeeping for continuing
competence. (a) Each licensee shall keep and maintain records showing
that each course or activity for which credit is claimed has been completed.

(b) These records shall reflect the title of
the course or activity, the date taken or completed, and the record of
participation.

(c) Each licensee shall retain such
documentation for a period of seven years after the course or activity
concludes.

(d) Each licensee shall provide copies of such
documentation to the board or its designee within fourteen calendar days after
being requested to provide such documentation. [L 2013, c 35, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol10_Ch0436-0474
Next